Maryland, session 2026, HB1608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
4–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Ammunition” means a cartridge, shell, or other device containing
explosive or incendiary material designed and intended for use in a firearm.
(3) (i) “Firearm” means a handgun, rifle, shotgun, short–barreled rifle,
or short–barreled shotgun, as those terms are defined in § 4–201 of this title, or any other
firearm.
(ii) “Firearm” does not include an antique firearm as defined in §
4–201 of this title.
(b) This section does not apply if:
(1) the minor’s access to a firearm is supervised by an individual at least
18 years old;
(2) the minor’s access to a firearm was obtained as a result of an unlawful
entry;
(3) the firearm is in the possession or control of a law enforcement officer
while the officer is engaged in official duties; [or]
(4) the minor has a certificate of firearm and hunter safety issued under §
10–301.1 of the Natural Resources Article;
(5) THE MINOR OBTAINS THE FIREARM IN AN ACT OF LAWFUL
SELF–DEFENSE OR DEFENSE OF ANOTHER PERSON; OR
(6) THE FIREARM WAS STORED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–112 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) A person may not store or leave a [loaded] firearm in a location where the
person [knew] KNOWS or should [have known] KNOW that [an unsupervised minor has
access to the firearm] A MINOR IS LIKELY TO GAIN UNSUPERVISED ACCESS TO THE
FIREARM.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000.

HOUSE BILL 1608 3
(e) [(1)] A violation of this section may not:
[(i) be considered evidence of negligence;
(ii) be considered evidence of contributory negligence;
(iii)] (1) limit liability of a party or an insurer; or
[(iv)] (2) diminish recovery for damages arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or operation of a firearm or ammunition.
[(2) A party, witness, or lawyer may not refer to a violation of this section
during a trial of a civil action that involves property damage, personal injury, or death.]
4–112.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AUTHORIZED USER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) IS NOT PROHIBITED BY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW FROM
POSSESSING, RECEIVING, OWNING, OR PURCHASING A FIREARM; AND
(II) IS EITHER:
1. THE LAWFUL OWNER OF THE FIREARM; OR
2. LAWFULLY AUTHORIZED BY THE OWNER OF THE
FIREARM TO ACCESS, POSSESS, AND USE THE FIREARM.
(3) “CARRIED BY OR UNDER THE DIRECT CONTROL OF” MEANS AN
AUTHORIZED USER IS:
(I) CARRYING A FIREARM ON THE AUTHORIZED USER’S
PERSON; OR
(II) CLOSE ENOUGH TO A FIREARM TO READILY PREVENT AN
UNAUTHORIZED USER FROM GAINING ACCESS TO THE FIREARM.
(4) “FIREARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–104 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1608
(5) “SECURE STORAGE DEPOSITORY” MEANS A SAFE OR ANOTHER
SECURE CONTAINER THAT:
(I) WHEN LOCKED, IS INCAPABLE OF BEING OPENED WITHOUT
A KEY, A KEYPAD, A COMBINATION, OR ANY OTHER UNLOCKING MECHANISM;
(II) IS CAPABLE OF PREVENTING AN UNAUTHORIZED USER
FROM OBTAINING ACCESS TO AND POSSESSION OF A FIREARM CONTAINED INSIDE;
AND
(III) IS FIRE–, IMPACT–, AND TAMPER–RESISTANT.
(6) “UNAUTHORIZED USER” MEANS A PERSON WHO IS NOT AN
AUTHORIZED USER.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF:
(1) ACCESS TO A FIREARM WAS OBTAINED AS A RESULT OF AN
UNLAWFUL ENTRY INTO REAL PROPERTY; OR
(2) AN UNAUTHORIZED USER OBTAINS A FIREARM IN A LAWFUL ACT
OF SELF–DEFENSE OR DEFENSE OF ANOTHER PERSON.
(C) AN AUTHORIZED USER OF A FIREARM SHALL STORE THE FIREARM IN A
LOCKED SECURE STORAGE DEPOSITORY WHEN THE FIREARM IS NOT BEING
CARRIED BY OR UNDER THE DIRECT CONTROL OF THE AUTHORIZED USER.
(D) A PERSON MAY NOT VIOLATE SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) A PERSON MAY NOT VIOLATE SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
RESULTING IN AN UNAUTHORIZED USER:
(1) ACCESSING A FIREARM; AND
(2) CAUSING SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO OR DEATH OF A PERSON.
(F) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION IS GUILTY
OF A MISDEMEANOR AND:
(1) FOR A FIRST CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$500;

HOUSE BILL 1608 5
(2) FOR A SECOND CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $1,000; AND
(3) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT CONVICTION:
(I) IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000; AND
(II) SHALL BE PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING:
1. A REGULATED FIREARM UNDER § 5–133 OF THE
PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE;
2. A HANDGUN QUALIFICATION LICENSE UNDER §
5–117.1 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
3. A PERMIT UNDER § 5–306 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY
ARTICLE.
(G) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION IS GUILTY
OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION:
(1) IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000; AND
(2) SHALL BE PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING:
(I) A REGULATED FIREARM UNDER § 5–133 OF THE PUBLIC
SAFETY ARTICLE;
(II) A HANDGUN QUALIFICATION LICENSE UNDER § 5–117.1 OF
THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
(III) A PERMIT UNDER § 5–306 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(H) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE INTERPRETED TO AFFECT,
IMPAIR, OR SUPERSEDE ANY RESTRICTION BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION RELATING TO
THE SECURE STORAGE OF A FIREARM THAT IMPOSES ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS
ON THE OWNER OR CUSTODIAN OF THE FIREARM.
Article – Public Safety
5–133.
(b) Subject to § 5–133.3 of this subtitle, a person may not possess a regulated
firearm if the person:

HOUSE BILL 1608
(1) has been convicted of a disqualifying crime;
(2) has been convicted of a violation classified as a common law crime and
received a term of imprisonment of more than 2 years;
(3) (i) has been convicted on or after October 1, 2023, of a second or
subsequent violation of § 4–104 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(ii) has been convicted on or after October 1, 2023, of a violation of §
4–104 of the Criminal Law Article if the violation resulted in the use of a loaded firearm by
a minor causing death or serious bodily injury to the minor or another person;
(4) subject to subsection (b–1) of this section, is on supervised probation
after being convicted:
(i) of a crime punishable by imprisonment for 1 year or more;
(ii) for a violation of § 21–902(b) or (c) of the Transportation Article;
or
(iii) for violating a protective order under § 4–509 of the Family Law
Article;
(5) is a fugitive from justice;
(6) is a habitual drunkard;
(7) is addicted to a controlled dangerous substance or is a habitual user;
(8) suffers from a mental disorder as defined in § 10–101(i)(2) of the
Health – General Article and has a history of violent behavior against the person or
another;
(9) has been found incompetent to stand trial under § 3–106 of the Criminal
Procedure Article;
(10) has been found not criminally responsible under § 3–110 of the
Criminal Procedure Article;
(11) has been voluntarily admitted for more than 30 consecutive days to a
facility as defined in § 10–101 of the Health – General Article;
(12) has been involuntarily committed to a facility as defined in § 10–101 of
the Health – General Article;

HOUSE BILL 1608 7
(13) is under the protection of a guardian appointed by a court under §
13–201(c) or § 13–705 of the Estates and Trusts Article, except for cases in which the
appointment of a guardian is solely a result of a physical disability;
(14) except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, is a respondent
against whom:
(i) a current non ex parte civil protective order has been entered
under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article; or
(ii) an order for protection, as defined in § 4–508.1 of the Family Law
Article, has been issued by a court of another state or a Native American tribe and is in
effect; [or]
(15) if under the age of 30 years at the time of possession, has been
adjudicated delinquent by a juvenile court for an act that would be a disqualifying crime if
committed by an adult; OR
(16) HAS BEEN CONVICTED:
(I) THREE OR MORE TIMES OF A VIOLATION OF § 4–112(D) OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
(II) ONE OR MORE TIMES OF A VIOLATION OF § 4–112(E) OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
5–306.
(d) (1) The Secretary may not issue a permit to a person if the person:
(i) has been convicted on or after October 1, 2023, of a second or
subsequent violation of § 4–104 of the Criminal Law Article; [or]
(ii) has been convicted on or after October 1, 2023, of a violation of §
4–104 of the Criminal Law Article if the violation resulted in the use of a loaded firearm by
a minor causing death or serious bodily injury to the minor or another person; OR
(III) HAS BEEN CONVICTED:
1. THREE OR MORE TIMES OF A VIOLATION OF §
4–112(D) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
2. ONE OR MORE TIMES OF A VIOLATION OF § 4–112(E)
OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1608
(2) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Secretary may not issue
a permit to a person who has been convicted on or after October 1, 2023, of a violation of §
4–104 of the Criminal Law Article for 5 years following the date of the conviction.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.